Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1310
Operator; immunity from liability; when.

An operator, acting in good faith, shall not be liable to any person for actions taken pursuant to the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. Neither the State Racing and Gaming Commission nor the Department of Revenue shall initiate any administrative action or impose penalties on an operator who voluntarily reports to the commission activity described in section 9-1311.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 42.